District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

9-1219.11

Mayor authorized to open, extend, widen, or straighten alleys and minor streets; conditions; width of minor streets

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 714, 30 DCR 148

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 7-301 to 7-308.